New York, session 2025-2026, A10484.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 353 of the education law, as 2 amended by chapter 268 of the laws of 2011, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. The state university shall be governed, and all of its corporate 5 powers exercised, by a board of trustees. Such board shall consist of 6 eighteen members, [fifteen] ten of whom shall be appointed by the gover- 7 nor with the advice and consent of the senate, one of whom shall be 8 appointed by the speaker of the assembly, one of whom shall be appointed 9 by the temporary president of the senate, one of whom shall be the pres- 10 ident of the student assembly of the state university, ex-officio and 11 voting, one of whom shall be the president of the university faculty 12 senate, ex-officio and [non-voting] voting, [and] one of whom shall be 13 the president of the faculty council of community colleges, ex-officio 14 and [non-voting] voting, one of whom shall be a staff member of the 15 state university or the city university of New York and who shall be 16 elected to serve as trustee by a majority vote of staff members of the 17 state university and city university of New York, and two of whom shall 18 be alumni of the state university of New York who shall be elected to 19 serve as trustee by a majority vote of state university of New York 20 alumni. Such ex-officio members shall be subject to every provision of 21 any general, special, or local law, ordinance, charter, code, rule, or 22 regulation applying to the voting members of such board with respect to 23 the discharge of their duties, including, but not limited to, those 24 provisions setting forth codes of ethics, disclosure requirements, and 25 prohibiting business and professional activities. One member of the 26 board shall be designated by the governor as chairperson and one as 27 vice-chairperson. Of the members first appointed, two shall be appointed 28 for a term which shall expire on June thirtieth, nineteen hundred EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04146-01-5 A. 10484 2 1 fifty-two; one for a term which shall expire on June thirtieth, nineteen 2 hundred fifty-three; two for a term which shall expire on June thirti- 3 eth, nineteen hundred fifty-four; one for a term which shall expire on 4 June thirtieth, nineteen hundred fifty-five; two for a term which shall 5 expire on June thirtieth, nineteen hundred fifty-six; one for a term 6 which shall expire on June thirtieth, nineteen hundred fifty-seven; two 7 for a term which shall expire on June thirtieth, nineteen hundred 8 fifty-eight; one for a term which shall expire on June thirtieth, nine- 9 teen hundred fifty-nine; two for a term which shall expire on June thir- 10 tieth, nineteen hundred sixty; and one for a term which shall expire on 11 June thirtieth, nineteen hundred sixty-one. Vacancies shall be filled 12 for the unexpired term in the same manner as original appointments. The 13 term of office of each trustee appointed on or after April first, nine- 14 teen hundred eighty-six shall be seven years, except those of the 15 student member and the faculty members. Trustees shall receive no 16 compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for their 17 expenses actually and necessarily incurred by them in the performance of 18 their duties under this article. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.